apertium-unm.unm.lexd
:{N}{e}>   >a               <dir><s_1sg><o_3sg>      # -dir-3  -a-w
:{N}{e}>   >a>o>k           <dir><s_1sg><o_3pl>
:{k}{e}>   >a               <dir><s_2sg><o_3sg>
:{k}{e}>   >a>o>k           <dir><s_2sg><o_3pl>
:{w}{e}>   >a>o             <dir><s_3sg><o_3sg>
:{w}{e}>   >a>o             <dir><s_3sg><o_3pl>           # Dir/LR
:{w}{e}>   >a>o>k           <dir><s_3sg><o_3pl>
:{N}{e}>   >a>w>ëna         <dir><s_11pl><o_3sg>
:{N}{e}>   >a>w>na          <dir><s_11pl><o_3sg>          # Dir/LR
#:{N}{e}>   >a>o>hëna        <dir><s_11pl><o_3sg>     # Dir/LR  cf. nëmàxkaohëna (??)
:{N}{e}>   >a>w>ënanàk      <dir><s_11pl><o_3pl>
:{k}{e}>   >a>w>ena         <dir><s_12pl><o_3sg>
:{k}{e}>   >a>w>na          <dir><s_12pl><o_3sg>         # Dir/LR
:{k}{e}>   >a>w>ënanàk      <dir><s_12pl><o_3pl>
:{k}{e}>   >a>w>a           <dir><s_2pl><o_3sg>
:{k}{e}>   >a>w>aok         <dir><s_2pl><o_3pl>          # Dir/LR CHECK: was >a>w>a
:{k}{e}>   >a>w>aok         <dir><s_2pl><o_3pl>          # CHECK
:{w}{e}>   >a>w>oo          <dir><s_3pl>
:{w}{e}>   >a>w>ao          <dir><s_3pl>                # Dir/LR


:{N}{e}>   >ùk>w            <inv><o_1sg><s_sg>
:{N}{e}>   >ùk              <inv><o_1sg><s_sg>    # Dir/LR
:{N}{e}>   >{ù}kùk>w        <inv><o_1sg><s_pl>    # -ëk-w-àk -inv-3-pl.anim
:{N}{e}>   >{ù}kùk          <inv><o_1sg><s_pl>    # Dir/LR
:{k}{e}>   >ùk>w            <inv><o_2sg><s_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >ùk              <inv><o_2sg><s_sg>    # Dir/LR
:{k}{e}>   >{ù}kùk>w        <inv><o_2sg><s_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{ù}kùk          <inv><o_2sg><s_pl>    # Dir/LR
:{w}{e}>   >ku              <inv><o_3sg><s_sg>
:{w}{e}>   >ku              <inv><o_3sg><s_pl>    # CHECK: extra -k?
:{N}{e}>   >ku>na           <inv><o_11pl><s_sg>
:{N}{e}>   >ku>nanàk        <inv><o_11pl><s_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >ku>na           <inv><o_12pl><s_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >ku>nanàk        <inv><o_12pl><s_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >ku>w>a          <inv><o_2pl><s_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >ku>w>a>ok       <inv><o_2pl><s_pl>
:{w}{e}>   >ku>w>oo         <inv><o_3pl>

:{k}{e}>   >el              <dir><s_1sg><o_2sg>
:{k}{e}>   >el>humo         <dir><s_1sg><o_2pl>
:{k}{e}>   >i               <dir><s_2sg><o_1sg>
:{k}{e}>   >i>hëna          <dir><s_2sg><o_1pl>
:{k}{e}>   >el>uhëna        <dir><s_1pl><o_2sg>
:{k}{e}>   >el>humëna       <dir><s_1pl><o_2pl>
:{k}{e}>   >i>hëmo          <dir><s_2pl><o_1sg>

:{N}{e}>   >an              <cnj><dir><s_1sg><o_3sg>      # -dir-inan a-ne
:{k}{e}>   >aneyo           <cnj><dir><s_2pl><o_3sp>
:{k}{e}>   >aneyo           <cnj><dir><s_2pl><o_3sp>
:{w}{e}>   >{e}n            <subord><dir><s_3sg><o_3sg>   #


LEXICON VerbInflTASub(3)   # Subordinative

:{N}{e}>      >an           <dir><s_1sg><o_3sg>
:{N}{e}>      >an>eyo       <dir><s_1sg><o_3pl>
:{k}{e}>      >an           <dir><s_2sg><o_3sg>
:{k}{e}>      >an>eyo       <dir><s_2sg><o_3pl>
:{w}{e}{³}>   >an           <dir><s_3sg><o_3sg>
:{w}{e}{³}>   >an>eyo       <dir><s_3sg><o_3pl>
:{N}{e}>      >an>en        <dir><s_11><o_3sg>
:{N}{e}>      >an>en>eyo    <dir><s_11><o_3pl>
:{k}{e}>      >an>en        <dir><s_12><o_3sg>
:{k}{e}>      >an>en>eyo    <dir><s_12><o_3pl>
:{k}{e}>      >an>eyo       <dir><s_2pl><o_3sg>
:{k}{e}>      >an>eyo       <dir><s_2pl><o_3pl>
:{w}{e}{³}>   >an>eyo       <dir><s_3pl><o_3sg>
:{w}{e}{³}>   >an>eyo       <dir><s_3pl><o_3pl>


# FIXME: add inverse and local


LEXICON N-Poss(3)

:{N}{e}>   :                <px1sg>
:{k}{e}>   :                <px2sg>
:{w}{e}>   :>a              <px3sg>      # Fix plurals  - technically -a is obviative
:{N}{e}>   :>ena            <px1plexcl>
:{k}{e}>   :>ena            <px1plincl>
:{k}{e}>   :>ewao           <px2pl>
:{k}{e}>   :>uwa            <px2pl>      # Dir/LR
:{w}{e}>   :>ëwoo           <px3pl>


PATTERN DetRoot

Determiners(1) [ <det>: ] Determiners(2):

PATTERN PronRoot

Pronouns(1) [ <prn>: ] Pronouns(2):




###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON NounRoot-Anim

ahas:ahas               # "crow" pl - ahasak
tëme:tëme               # "wolf" pl - temeyok
maxkw:maxkw             # "bear" pl - maxkok
aihàm:aihàm             # "golden eagle" pl - aihamuk
ketukw:ket{u}kw         # "knee" pl - ketkuk
chahkol:chahkol         # "frog"
chulëns:chulëns         # "bird"
mwekane:mwekane         # "dog"
xanikw:xanikw           # "squirrel"
chinkwe:chinkwe         # "bobcat"
shkakw:shkakw           # "skunk"
opalaniye:opalaniye     # "bald eagle"
maxkalaniyat:maxkalaniyat # "hawk"
awèn:awèn               # "person" (pl: awènik)
hìtukw:hìt{u}kw         # "tree"
xkwe:xkwe               # "woman"
xkwechëch:xkwechëch     # "girl"
pilaechëch:pilaechëch   # "boy"
utènay:utènay           # "town"
hopënis:hopënis         # "potato"
ila:ila                 # "warrior" (pl: ilaok)
lënu:lënu               # "man"
sisawin:sisawin         # "oyster"
mësinkw:mësinkw         # "Game Spirit; False Face"
hilusës:hilusës         # "old man"
manëtu:manëtu           # "Spirit"
mimëns:mimëns           # "child"
mimëntët:mimëntët       # "baby"   FIXME: <dim>
sakima:sakima           # "chief"
nehënaonkès:nehënaonkès # "horse"
kawiya:kawiya           # "porcupine" CHECK anim?
shëwanàkw:shëwanàkw     # "white person"
kèhkitënikèt:kèhkitënikèt  # "doctor"
welathakèt:welathakèt   # "doctor"
tënte-tëpchehëlas:tënte-tëpchehëlas # "train" (CHECK - inan)
kèhkëlixikèt:kèhkëlixikèt  # "seamstress"
mèxèlkatèlis:mèxèlkatèlis  # "water strider"
èhës:èh{e}s             # "clam"
xkuk:xkuk               # "snake"
mikwën:mikwën           # "feather"
xès:xès                 # "skin"
pèhpichkwik:pèhpichkwik # "(wild) carrot" CHECK: diacritics
òhtas:òhtas             # "doll"


LEXICON NounRoot-Inan

hèmpës:hèmp{e}s         # "shirt, clothes" pl - hempsa
ahkwiyàn:ahkwiyàn       # "blanket"
chipakw:chipakw         # "shoe" pl - chipako
shohpe:shope            # "shore" pl - shopeyo  Dir/LR
shohpe:shohpe           # "shore"
milàxk:milàxk           # "human hair"
mixekën:mixekën         # "body hair, fur"
mamon:mamon             # "eyebrow"
xkwekankan:xkewkankan   # "neck"
wananu:wananu           # "cheek" pl - wananuwa
hwikwi:hwikwi           # "chin"
shetun:shetun           # "lip"
wipit:wipit             # "tooth"
kwitsit:kwitsit         # "toe"
wiskon:wiskon           # "elbow"
hwikash:hwikash         # "nail, hoof, claw"
welench:welench         # "finger"
ahshilunkon:ahshilunkon # "armpit"
tukwelench:tukwelench   # "fish"
xkelixen:xkelixen       # "rib"
xkan:xkan               # "bone"
mutay:mutay             # "stomach"
weshkinkw:weshkinkw     # "eye; face" pl - weshkinko
teh:teh                 # "heart"
pom:pom                 # "thigh; ham"
hwikxkon:hwikxkon       # "shin"
tankat:tankat           # "ankle"
tuhwepi:tuhwepi         # "body"
wil:wil                 # "head"
hopikon:hopikon         # "shoulder"
hwitaok:hwitaok         # "ear"
tun:tun                 # "mouth"
wìkiyon:wìkiyon         # "nose"
naolk:naolk             # "arm"
naxk:naxk               # "hand"
hwikat:hwikat           # "leg"
wsit:wsit               # "foot"
mehemichink:mehemichink # "food"
shakhùkwiyàn:shakùkwiyàn # "coat"  Conversations version  # Dir/LR
shakhùkwiyàn:shakùkwiàn # "coat"                 # Dir/LR
shakhùkwiyàn:shakhùkwiyàn # "coat"  compromise version?
shakhùkwiyàn:shakhùkwiàn # "coat"  LTD version   # Dir/LR
lenhaksen:lenhaksen     # "moccasin"
mayakhwikan:mayakhwikan # "rake"
hòkès:hòkès             # "bark; box"
mënëpekw:mënëpekw       # "lake"
mùxul:mùxul             # "canoe, boat"
ahchu:ahchu{h}{w}       # "hill, (mountain)"
paent:paent             # "cup"
chipàkw:chipàkw         # "shoe"
ahshikan:ahshikan       # "sock"
lokèns:lokèns           # "plate"
ehukwenk:ehukwenk       # "necklace"
tepinxkepi:tepinxkepi   # "bracelet"
mòkël:mòkël             # "hammer"
kishku:kishku           # "day"  (pl: kishko)
xalahputisikaon:xalahputisikaon  # "spider web"
lehikan:lehikan         # "book; letter"
taxàn:taxàn             # "wood, firewood"
namès:namès             # "fish"
amànakw:amànakw         # "fishing pole"
lòkwënipuwakàn:lòkwënipuwakàn # "supper"
shkul:shkul             # "school"
mënëkòn:mënëkòn         # "rainbow"
tùkòpi:tùkòpi           # "rope"
èhèntalipwink:èhèntalipwink  # "table"
shinkèk:shinkèk         # "woods, timberland, forest"
tèkëne:tèkëne           # "forest, woods"
aptunakàn:aptunakàn     # "word"
mësakw:mësakw           # "log"
wiyus:wiyus             # "meat"
mhuwe:mhuwe             # "The Cannibal"
mhuwe:hmuwe             # "The Cannibal"  Dir/LR
pëmi:pëmi               # "grease, fat, lard"
phake:phake             # "piece"  CHECK inam
phake:phakee            # "piece"  CHECK inam  Dir/LR
wënchi:wënchi           # "reason"
hàki:hàki               # "dirt; ground; earth; land"
mpi:mpi                 # "water"
kshitay:kshitay         # "soup"
kshitay:shitay          # "soup"  Dir/LR
kaxeya:kaxeya           # "dried pumpkin" (PL: kaxeyaya)
xàskwim:xàskwim         # "corn"
lehëlexeokàn:lehëlexeokàn  # "life"
lamamenxke:lamamenxke   # "yard (around a house)"
shaèim:shaèim           # "nut; fruit (from a tree)" CHECK: INAN
mpiapu:mpiapu           # "juice"  CHECK:INAN
suti:suti               # "soda; baking soda"
wënspi:wënspi           # "juice"
mënànchi:mënànchi       # "left; left-hand side"
ahsën:ahsën             # "rock; stone"
lakeokàn:lakeokàn       # "(tribal) rite; (tribal) ceremony"
chëphìk:chëphìk         # "root; radish"
tëmètos:tëmètos         # "tomato"
òsʼhakame:òsʼhakame     # "heaven" CHECK: N-INAN
ahpikòn:ahpikòn         # "flute; musical instrument"


LEXICON NounRoot-Family(2)

# Vocative          Possessive stem
kahes:ana           kahes:kahes         # "mother"
ux:nuxa             ux:ux               # "father"
kwis:nkwis          kwis:kwis           # "son"
ichan:nichan        ichan:ichan         # "daughter"
uehm:uma            uhem:uhem           # "grandmother"
mëxumes:mëxumsa     mëxumes:mëxumes     # "grandfather"
mis:xatash          mis:m{_w}is         # "older sister"
xans:xansa          xans:xans           # "older brother"
xisëmës:naxisëmës   xisëmës:x{_w}isëmës # "younger sister/brother/cousin"
xisëmës:naxisëmës   xisëmës:x{_w}ësëmës # "younger sister/brother/cousin" ! Dir/LR
itis:itis           itis:itis           # "friend"

LEXICON VerbRootAI(2)

# Lesson 1
wëlamàls:{w}{e}lamàls{IU}  <iv><aa> # "feel well"
tixëm:tixëm{w}{IU}      <iv><aa> # "bathe"    # w
tixëm:tixàm{w}{IU}      <iv><aa> # "bathe"   ! Dir/LR
alam:{t}alam{IU}        <iv><aa> # "be frightened/scared" "корк"
wishas:wishas{IU}       <iv><aa> # "be frightened/startled" "чочу"
mikentam:mikentam       <iv><aa> # "do something"
pils:pils{IU}           <iv><aa> # "be clean"

# Lesson 2
pals:pals{IU}				<iv><aa>	# "be sick"
wikwihel:wikwihel{Æ}		<iv><aa>	# "be tired"
kes:kes{IU}					<iv><aa>	# "be hot"
akohch:{t}akohch{IU}		<iv><aa>	# "be cold"
alëmsk:{t}alëmsk{Æ}		<iv><aa>	# "leave, go away, depart, set out"
machi:machi 				<iv><aa>	# "go home"

# Lesson 3
asu:{t}asu{w}{IU}       <iv><aa> # "sing"
puhenema:puhenema       <iv><aa> # "drum"
kentk:kentk{Æ}          <iv><aa> # "dance"
lashim:{t}{e}lashim{w}{IU} <iv><aa> # "dream"   # w

# Lesson 4
katupw:katup{w}{IU}     <iv><aa> # "be hungry"
tite:{l}ite{h}e         <iv><aa> # "think"
mits:mits{IU}           <iv><aa> # "eat; dine"
mëne:mëne               <iv><aa> # "drink"
katusëm:katusëm{w}{IU}  <iv><aa> # "be thirsty"   # w

# Lesson 5

ahp:ahp{IU}             <iv><aa> # "exist"
hate:hate               <iv><aa>
katusamwi:katusamw{IU}  <iv><aa>
